North Carolina, session 2025, HB1164.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-357(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Acceptance of Checks and Electronic Payment. – The tax collector may accept checks
and electronic payments, as defined in G.S. 147-86.20, in payment of taxes, as authorized by
G.S. 159-32.1. Acceptance of a check or electronic payment is at the tax collector's own risk. A
tax collector who accepts electronic payment of taxes may add a fee to each electronic payment
transaction to offset the service charge the taxing unit pays for electronic payment service. A tax
collector who accepts electronic payment or check in payment of taxes may issue the tax receipt
immediately or withhold the receipt until the check has been collected or the electronic payment
invoice has been honored by the issuer.
If a tax collector accepts a check or an electronic payment and issues a tax receipt and the
check is returned unpaid (without negligence on the part of the tax collector in presenting the
check for payment) or the electronic payment invoice is not honored by the issuer, the taxes for
which the check or electronic payment was given shall be deemed unpaid; the tax collector shall
immediately correct the copy of the tax receipt and other appropriate records to show the fact of
nonpayment, and shall give written notice by certified or registered mail to the person to whom
the tax receipt was issued to return it to the tax collector. After correcting the records to show the
fact of nonpayment, the tax collector shall proceed to collect the taxes by the use of any remedies
allowed for the collection of taxes or by bringing a civil action on the check or electronic
payment.
A financial institution with which a taxing unit has contracted for receipt of payment of taxes
may accept a check in payment of taxes. If the check is honored, the financial institution shall so
notify the tax collector, who shall, upon request of the taxpayer, issue a receipt for payment of
the taxes. If the check is returned unpaid, the financial institution shall so notify the tax collector,
*H1164-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
who shall proceed to collect the taxes by use of any remedy allowed for collection of taxes or by
bringing a civil action on the check.
…
(2) Penalty. – In addition to interest for nonpayment of taxes provided by
G.S. 105-360 and in addition to any criminal penalties provided by law, the
penalty for presenting in payment of taxes a check or electronic funds transfer
that is returned or not completed because of insufficient funds or nonexistence
of an account of the drawer or transferor is twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or ten
percent (10%) of the amount of the check or electronic invoice, whichever is
greater, subject to a maximum of one thousand dollars ($1,000). This penalty
does not apply if the tax collector finds that, when the check or electronic
funds transfer was presented for payment, the drawer of the check or transferor
of funds had sufficient funds in an account at a financial institution in this
State to make the payment and, by inadvertence, the drawer of the check or
transferor of the funds failed to draw the check or initiate a transfer on the
account that had sufficient funds. is, subject to a maximum of one thousand
dollars ($1,000), (i) for the first two violations for which a penalty is imposed
under this section within the past five years, twenty-five dollars ($25.00) plus
one percent (1%) of the amount of the check or electronic invoice or (ii) for
any other violation, fifty dollars ($50.00) plus two percent (2%) of the amount
of the check or electronic invoice. This penalty shall be added to and collected
in the same manner as the taxes for which the check or electronic payment
was given."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Revenue the sum of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027
fiscal year to be used by the Department for educational materials and assistance to the public
and county tax collectors with respect to the change in law regarding the penalty for presenting
in payment of taxes a check or electronic funds transfer that is returned or not completed because
of insufficient funds or nonexistence of an account, as set forth in G.S. 105-357(b), as modified
by this act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this act is effective when it becomes law and applies to
payments of taxes made on or after that date. The remainder of this act is effective when it
becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 1164-First Edition